Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5255
Standard health benefit plan, defined.

Standard health benefit plan shall mean a health benefit plan regulated by the board.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 33;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 10.